Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.902

Applicable fees, charges, and penalties.

Partnerships are subject to the applicable fees, charges, and penalties established by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260 and 43.07.120.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5121; 1998 c 103 s 1306.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.